District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2021.14

Records and accounts; report to Congress.

Repealed.

Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 881, ch. 779, § 14
Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 146(a)(2)
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-312, § 2(i), 60 DCR 3434
1981 Ed., § 31-1236.
1973 Ed., § 31-734.
Section 2(i) of D.C. Law 19-313 repealed this section.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-313 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary repeal of section, see § 2(h) of the Retirement of Public-School Teachers Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-584, January 1, 2013, 60 DCR 134).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 2(i) of the Retirement of Public-School Teachers Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-41, March 25, 2013, 60 DCR 5361, 20 DCSTAT 527).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.